Utah statutes.
31A-27a-604.   Claims under an occurrence policy, surety bond, surety undertaking.

(1)  Subject to Section 31A-27a-603, an insured may file a claim for the protection afforded under the insured's policy, irrespective of whether a claim is known at the time of filing, if the policy is an occurrence policy.

(2)  Subject to Section 31A-27a-603, an obligee may file a claim for the protection afforded under a surety bond or a surety undertaking issued by the insurer as to which the obligee is the beneficiary, irrespective of whether a claim is known at the time of filing.

(3)  After a claim is filed under Subsection (1) or (2), when a specific claim is made by or against the insured or by the obligee:

(a)  the insured or the obligee shall supplement the claim; and

(b)  the receiver shall treat the claim as a contingent or unliquidated claim under Section 31A-27a-605.



Enacted by Chapter 309, 2007 General Session

